Illinois, session 104th, SB3590.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Artificial Intelligence Product Liability Act. 6    Section 5. Intent. The General Assembly finds that 7artificial intelligence shifts decision-making power and 8responsibility away from persons to software-based systems, 9often without direct human oversight. While this technology 10offers significant benefits, its deployment has already caused 11measurable harm to individuals and businesses.12    The General Assembly also finds that developers of 13artificial intelligence have an obligation to make the systems 14safe when used in reasonably foreseeable ways. Deployers of 15these products also have an obligation to ensure that these 16products are used in a way that does not materially affect an 17individual's rights. 18    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 19    "Artificial intelligence" has the meaning set forth in 20Section 2-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 21    "Consequential decision" means a decision that either has 22a legal or similarly significant effect on an individual's   SB3590- 2 -LRB104 20015 SPS 33466 b1access to the criminal justice system, housing, employment, 2credit, education, health care, or insurance. 3    "Deployer" means a person, including a developer, who uses 4or operates an artificial intelligence system for use by a 5deployer or for use by third parties. "Deployer" does not 6include an individual or business with fewer than 20 employees 7or less than 10,000 users of its product. 8    "Design" means the intended or known physical and material 9characteristics of a product and shall include any intended or 10known formulation or content of the product and the usual 11result of the intended development or other process used to 12produce the product, which includes, but is not limited to, 13unexpected skills or behaviors that appear in a product. 14    "Developer" means a person who designs, codes, produces, 15owns, or substantially modifies an artificial intelligence 16system for use by a developer or for use by a third party. 17"Developer" does not include a person who uses an open source 18artificial intelligence system but does not substantially 19modify the system. 20    "Express warranty" means any material, positive statement, 21affirmation of fact, promise, or description relating to a 22product, including any sample or model of a product. 23    "Harm" means: 24        (1) damage to property other than the product itself; 25        (2) personal physical, financial or reputational 26    injury, illness, or death;   SB3590- 3 -LRB104 20015 SPS 33466 b1        (3) mental or psychological anguish, emotional harm, 2    or distortion of a person's behavior that would be highly 3    offensive to a reasonable person; or 4        (4) any loss of consortium or services or other loss 5    deriving from any type of harm described in this Act. 6    "High-impact artificial intelligence system" means any 7artificial intelligence system, regardless of the number of 8parameters and supervision structure, that is: 9        (1) used, reasonably foreseeable as being used, or is 10    a controlling factor in making a consequential decision; 11        (2) used, or reasonably foreseeable as being used, to 12    categorize groups of persons by protected characteristics, 13    such as race, ethnic origin, or religious belief; 14        (3) used, or reasonably foreseeable as being used, in 15    the direct management or operation of critical 16    infrastructure; 17        (4) used, or reasonably foreseeable as being used, in 18    a vehicle, a medical device, or in the safety system of a 19    vehicle or medical device; 20        (5) used, or reasonably foreseeable as being used, to 21    engage in a synthetic relationship; and 22        (6) exhibits, or could be easily modified to exhibit, 23    high levels of performance at tasks that pose a serious 24    risk to economic security, public health or safety, or any 25    combination of those matters. 26    "Material fact" means any specific characteristic or   SB3590- 4 -LRB104 20015 SPS 33466 b1quality of the product. "Material fact" does not include a 2general opinion about, or praise of, the product or its 3quality. 4    "Method of development" includes, but is not limited to, 5the selection of training data for the product, and training, 6testing, auditing, and fine-tuning the product. 7    "Person" means any individual, corporation, company, 8association, firm, partnership, society, joint stock company, 9or any other entity, including any government entity or 10unincorporated association of persons. 11    "Product" means a high-impact artificial intelligence 12system or a generative artificial intelligence system. 13    "Product release" means the specific way in which a 14product is integrated and made accessible within a production 15environment, including how it interacts with data sources, 16delivers predictions or results, and is accessed by users. 17    "Synthetic relationship" means a series of interactions 18between an individual and an artificial intelligence system 19that mimics human interaction and emotional responses. 20    Section 15. Developer accountability for harm to consumers 21or businesses. 22    (a) In any products liability action, a developer shall be 23liable to a plaintiff only if the plaintiff establishes: 24        (1) that the developer failed to exercise reasonable 25    care with respect to the design of the product and the   SB3590- 5 -LRB104 20015 SPS 33466 b1    failure to exercise reasonable care was a proximate cause 2    of harm to the plaintiff; 3        (2) that the developer failed to exercise reasonable 4    care with respect to providing adequate instructions or 5    warnings applicable to the product that allegedly caused 6    the harm that is the subject of the complaint and the 7    failure to provide adequate instructions or warnings was a 8    proximate cause of harm to the plaintiff; and 9        (3) that the developer failed to exercise reasonable 10    care with respect to providing an express warranty 11    applicable to the product that allegedly caused the harm 12    that is the subject of the complaint; the product failed 13    to conform to the warranty; and the failure of the product 14    to conform to the warranty caused harm to the plaintiff. 15    (b) In any action alleging that a product is unreasonably 16dangerous because of a defective design, the plaintiff shall 17prove by a preponderance of the evidence that, at the time the 18product left the developer's control: 19        (1) the developer knew or, in light of then-existing 20    scientific and technical knowledge, reasonably should have 21    known of the danger that caused the plaintiff's harm; 22        (2) the developer accounted for both intended uses and 23    reasonably foreseeable unintended uses of their systems; 24    and 25        (3) there existed a technologically feasible and 26    practical alternative design, including, but not limited   SB3590- 6 -LRB104 20015 SPS 33466 b1    to, product release and the method of development, that 2    would have reduced or avoided a foreseeable risk of harm 3    without significantly impairing the usefulness of the 4    product to the group of persons who are the intended and 5    legitimate users of the product. 6    (c) In any action alleging that a product is defective 7because it failed to contain adequate instructions or 8warnings: 9        (1) An adequate warning or instruction is one that a 10    reasonably prudent person in the same or similar 11    circumstances would have provided with respect to the 12    danger and communicates sufficient information on the 13    dangers and safe use of the product, taking into account 14    the characteristics of, and the ordinary knowledge common 15    to an ordinary consumer who uses the product. 16        (2) The plaintiff shall prove by a preponderance of 17    the evidence that, at the time the product left the 18    developer's control, the developer knew or, in light of 19    then-existing scientific and technical knowledge, 20    reasonably should have known of the danger that caused the 21    plaintiff's harm. 22        (3) A developer shall not be liable for failure to 23    instruct or warn about a danger that is known or open and 24    obvious to the user or consumer of the product, or should 25    have been known or open and obvious to the user or consumer 26    of the product, taking into account the characteristics   SB3590- 7 -LRB104 20015 SPS 33466 b1    of, and the ordinary knowledge common to, the persons who 2    ordinarily use or consume the product. 3    A danger is presumed to not be open and obvious to a user 4or consumer of the product under 17 years old. 5    (d) A product may be unreasonably dangerous because it did 6not conform to an express warranty only if the plaintiff 7proves by a preponderance of the evidence that: 8        (1) the plaintiff reasonably relied on an express 9    warranty made by the developer about a material fact 10    concerning the safety of the product; 11        (2) this express warranty proved to be untrue; and 12        (3) the plaintiff would not have been harmed if the 13    representation had been true. 14    Section 20. Deployer accountability for harm to consumer 15or business. 16    (a) A deployer shall be deemed to be liable as a developer 17under Section 15 for harm caused by a product if: 18        (1) the deployer makes material and substantial change 19    to the product; or 20        (2) the deployer intentionally misuses the product 21    contrary to the express warranty and that use was the 22    proximate cause of harm to the plaintiff. 23    (b) For the purposes of this Section, a use of a product 24that is intended by the developer of the product does not 25constitute a misuse or material or substantial change of the   SB3590- 8 -LRB104 20015 SPS 33466 b1product. If a developer does not specify an intended use for 2the product, intended use shall be inferred by the targeted 3market and manner of distribution. 4    (c) Any deployer licensing a product shall not be liable 5to a plaintiff for violations subsection (a) of Section 15 by 6another solely by reason of ownership or use of the product. 7    Section 25. Applicability and enforcement. 8    (a) This Act shall supplement any common law tort 9liability and any product liability laws of this State. This 10Act does not prohibit any product liability cause of action 11involving a generative artificial intelligence system or a 12high-impact artificial intelligence system brought under a 13different claim pursuant to product liability common law or 14statute. This Section does not supersede any product liability 15cause of action under State law except to the extent that the 16law would directly conflict with the provisions of this Act. 17    (b) Products used strictly for peer-reviewed scientific 18research are exempt from this Act. 19    (c) In a liability action brought under this Act, the 20court shall apply a comparative negligence standard, whereby a 21plaintiff's recovery shall be diminished in proportion to the 22percentage of fault attributable to the plaintiff, but the 23recovery shall not be barred regardless of the plaintiff's 24degree of fault, and developers and deployers may be held 25jointly and severally liable for the portion of harm that   SB3590- 9 -LRB104 20015 SPS 33466 b1contributed to the plaintiff's injury. 2    In a liability action brought under this Act, the damages 3for which a deployer is otherwise liable shall be reduced by 4the percentage of responsibility for the plaintiff's harm 5attributable to violations of Section 15 by any person if the 6defendant establishes that the percentage of the plaintiff's 7harm was proximately caused by a violation under Section 15. 8    (d) In any products liability action brought under this 9Act, a court shall recognize a rebuttable presumption that a 10product is not defective if and only if that deployer: 11        (1) has conducted a documented testing, evaluation, 12    verification, validation, and auditing of that system 13    consistent with industry best practices, such as the 14    latest version of the National Institute of Standards and 15    Technology Artificial Intelligence Risk Management 16    Framework; 17        (2) has mitigated foreseeable risks to the extent 18    possible and has considered alternatives; 19        (3) has disclosed foreseeable risks and mitigation 20    tactics directly to deployers and consumers using the 21    product; 22        (4) has maintained and made available upon request by 23    the Attorney General an artificial intelligence data sheet 24    that includes, at a minimum, the following information: 25            (A) information on the intended contexts and uses 26        of the artificial intelligence model in accordance   SB3590- 10 -LRB104 20015 SPS 33466 b1        with the map guidelines articulated in the National 2        Institute of Standards and Technology's latest 3        Artificial Intelligence Risk Management Framework; 4            (B) information regarding the datasets upon which 5        the artificial intelligence was trained, including 6        sources, volume, whether the dataset is proprietary, 7        and how the datasets further the intended purpose of 8        the product; 9            (C) information accounting for foreseeable risks 10        identified in the management guidelines of the 11        National Institute of Standards and Technology's 12        latest Artificial Intelligence Risk Management 13        Framework and information about steps taken to manage 14        those risks; and 15            (D) information concerning the results of 16        red-teaming testing and steps taken to mitigate 17        identified risks, based on guidance developed by the 18        National Institute of Standards and Technology;19        (5) has, if the product is designed for or is 20    reasonably likely to be used by individuals under 17 years 21    old, documented assessments of use of the product's impact 22    on cognitive and emotional development, implemented 23    age-gating or content restrictions for a product that 24    poses foreseeable risks, and provided to deployers and 25    direct consumers and their guardians clear, accessible 26    disclosures about potential risks; and   SB3590- 11 -LRB104 20015 SPS 33466 b1        (6) has prominently included in the terms and 2    conditions of a product the information included in an 3    artificial intelligence data sheet, that deployers of the 4    product may rely upon when making fit-for-use and 5    deployment decisions. 6    (e) In any products liability action brought under this 7Act, a court shall recognize a rebuttable presumption that a 8product is not defective if and only if that deployer has 9designed and implemented a risk management policy that: 10        (1) specifies the principles, processes, and personnel 11    that the deployer shall use in maintaining the risk 12    management policy to identify, mitigate, and document any 13    risk, especially those impacting individuals under 17 14    years old, that is a reasonably foreseeable consequence of 15    deploying or using the system; 16        (2) is consistent with industry best practices, such 17    as the latest version of the National Institute of 18    Standards and Technology Artificial Intelligence Risk 19    Management Framework;20        (3) is reasonable considering: 21            (A) the size and complexity of the deployer; 22            (B) the nature and scope of the system, including 23        the intended uses and unintended uses and the 24        modifications made to the system by the deployer; and 25            (C) the data that the system, once deployed, 26        processes as inputs; and   SB3590- 12 -LRB104 20015 SPS 33466 b1        (4) is electronically available to its employees and 2    to the Attorney General upon request. 3    (f) This Act applies with respect to any action commenced 4on or after the effective date of this Act without regard to 5whether the harm that is the subject of the action or the 6conduct that caused the harm occurred before that date. 7    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 8severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes.